North Carolina, session 2025, HB783.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Sidekicks Academy, Inc., to
provide its program that helps empower marginalized students in the Durham Public Schools
through the combination of the martial arts, character development, and community support by
creating a safe and inclusive environment where every student can thrive and realize their full
potential. These funds shall be used as follows:
(1) Ninety thousand dollars ($90,000) for students' training attire, safety
equipment, an intra-school Taekwondo tournament, digital advertising
upkeep, and staff salary.
(2) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for experiential education, which includes
field trips to local Taekwondo tournaments, local museum visits, and
educational and sporting events on local college campuses.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H783-v-1*